Hawaii statutes.
[PART
III.] ART IN PUBLIC PLACES AND RELOCATABLE WORKS

OF [ART]
PROGRAMS AND STATE ART MUSEUM

[§9-21]
Purpose. The foundation shall administer the
art in public places and relocatable works of art programs, pursuant to section
103-8.5, and the state art museum to achieve the following purposes:

(1) Replace in public state buildings the natural
beauty displaced in construction with works of art expressive of the State's
cultural, creative, and traditional arts of its various ethnic groups;

(2) Support, promote, and recognize excellence of the
State's diverse cultural, creative, and traditional artists; and

(3) Create, display, and maintain in public places
and the state art museum a collection of works of art that:

(A) Represents the diversity and excellence of
the State's artistic expression; and

(B) Provides to all the citizens of the State
the fullest possible access to the highest quality aesthetic and educational
experiences available. [L 2004, c 125, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next